Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-619.01
Governor; selection of running mate; filing; procedure.

The candidate for Governor of each political party receiving the highest number of votes in the primary election shall select a candidate for Lieutenant Governor of the same political party by filing an affidavit indicating his or her choice with the Secretary of State. The candidate for Lieutenant Governor shall file a written consent with the Secretary of State. Both the affidavit and the written consent shall be filed on or before September 1 for the names to be on the general election ballot. The written consent shall be in lieu of a candidate filing form, and no filing fees shall be required for the candidate for Lieutenant Governor.

Laws 2001, LB 768, § 2.